root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *K:
   [Eě]    > TE
   [Eě]    > TI
   [Eě]    > TEM
   E    > -E,ATA
   E    > -E,AT
   E    > -E,ATůM
   E    > -E,ATECH
   E    > -E,ATY
   [^DNT]ě    > -ě,ATA
   [^DNT]ě    > -ě,AT
   [^DNT]ě    > -ě,ATůM
   [^DNT]ě    > -ě,ATECH
   [^DNT]ě    > -ě,ATY
   Ně    > -Ně,ňATA
   Ně    > -Ně,ňAT
   Ně    > -Ně,ňATůM
   Ně    > -Ně,ňATECH
   Ně    > -Ně,ňATY
   Tě    > -Tě,ťATA
   Tě    > -Tě,ťAT
   Tě    > -Tě,ťATůM
   Tě    > -Tě,ťATECH
   Tě    > -Tě,ťATY
   Dě    > -Dě,ďATA
   Dě    > -Dě,ďAT
   Dě    > -Dě,ďATůM
   Dě    > -Dě,ďATECH
   Dě    > -Dě,ďATY
   A    > TU
   A    > TEM
   A    > TA
   A    > T
   A    > TůM
   A    > TECH
   A    > TY
   [^AEěíýďňťS]    > I
   [^AEěíýďňťS]    > í
   [^AEěíýďňťSMCšP]    > EM
   [^AEěíýďňťSMCšP]    > ECH
   [^AEěíýďňťSMC]    > MI
   [Pš]    > íCH
   [Pš]    > íM
   OC    > íCH
   OC    > íM
   MOC    > ECH
   MOC    > EM
   [^O]C    > ECH
   [^O]C    > EM
   ěC    > MI
   [^ě]C    > EMI
   ď    > -ď,DI
   ď    > -ď,Dí
   ď    > -ď,DíM
   ď    > -ď,DíCH
   [^EěU]ď    > -ď,DěMI
   [EěU]ď    > MI
   ť    > -ť,TI
   ť    > -ť,Tí
   ť    > -ť,TíM
   ť    > -ť,TíCH
   [^ě]ť    > -ť,TěMI
   ěť    > MI
   ES    > -ES,SI
   ES    > -ES,Sí
   ES    > -ES,SíM
   ES    > -ES,SíCH
   ES    > -ES,SEMI
   [^E]S    > I
   [^E]S    > í
   [^E]S    > íM
   [^E]S    > íCH
   [^E]S    > MI
   ý    > -ý,OST
   ý    > -ý,OSTI
   ý    > -ý,OSTí
   ý    > -ý,OSTEM
   ý    > -ý,OSTECH
   ý    > -ý,OSTMI
   í    > -í,OST
   í    > -í,OSTI
   í    > -í,OSTí
   í    > -í,OSTEM
   í    > -í,OSTECH
   í    > -í,OSTMI

flag *Y:
   ý    > -ý,á
   ý    > -ý,é
   ý    > -ý,éHO
   ý    > -ý,éMU
   ý    > -ý,éM
   ý    > M
   ý    > -ý,OU
   á    > -á,é
   á    > -á,OU
   á    > -á,ýCH
   á    > -á,ýM
   á    > -á,ýMI
   é    > HO
   é    > MU
   é    > M
   é    > -é,ýM
   é    > -é,á
   é    > -é,ýCH
   é    > -é,ýMI
   [^RHK]ý    > -ý,í
   Rý    > -Rý,ří
   [^C]Hý    > -Hý,Zí
   CHý    > -CHý,ší
   [^SCč]Ký    > -Ký,Cí
   SKý    > -SKý,šTí
   CKý    > -CKý,čTí
   čKý    > -Ký,Cí
   ý    > CH
   ý    > MI
   ý    > MA
   í    > HO
   í    > MU
   í    > M
   í    > CH
   í    > MI
   í    > MA
   [IO]J    > -OJ,éHO
   [IO]J    > -OJ,éMU
   [IO]J    > -OJ,ý
   [IO]J    > -OJ,éM
   [IO]J    > -OJ,ýM
   SK[IO]J    > -SKOJ,šTí
   CK[IO]J    > -CKOJ,čTí
   [^SC]K[IO]J    > -KOJ,Cí
   [^K][IO]J    > -OJ,í
   [IO]J    > -OJ,ýCH
   [IO]J    > -OJ,é
   [IO]J    > -OJ,ýMI
   [IY]    > HO
   [IY]    > MU
   [IY]    > M
   [IY]    > OVé
   [IY]    > CH
   [IY]    > ů
   [IY]    > ůM
   [IY]    > E
   [IY]    > íCH
   [IY]    > MI
   [IY]    > I
   E    > HO
   E    > MU
   E    > M
   E    > -E,OVé
   E    > -E,ů
   E    > -E,ůM
   E    > -E,Y
   E    > CH
   ě    > HO
   ě    > MU
   ě    > M
   Ně    > -Ně,ňOVé
   Ně    > -Ně,ňů
   Ně    > -Ně,ňůM
   ě    > -ě,I
   ě    > -ě,íCH
   ůV    > -ůV,OVA
   ůV    > -ůV,OVU
   ůV    > -ůV,OVě
   ůV    > -ůV,OVýM
   ůV    > -ůV,OVI
   ůV    > -ůV,OVY
   ůV    > -ůV,OVO
   ůV    > -ůV,OVOU
   ůV    > -ůV,OVýCH
   ůV    > -ůV,OVýMI
   ůV    > -ůV,OVýMA
   IN    > A
   IN    > U
   IN    > ě
   IN    > ýM
   IN    > I
   IN    > Y
   IN    > OU
   IN    > ýCH
   IN    > ýMI
   IN    > O
   IN    > ýMA
   EN    > -EN,OHO
   EN    > -EN,OMU
   EN    > -EN,OM
   EN    > -EN,íM
   EN    > -EN,A
   EN    > -EN,é
   EN    > -EN,U
   EN    > -EN,OU
   EN    > -EN,O
   EN    > -EN,I
   EN    > -EN,Y
   EN    > -EN,ěCH
   EN    > -EN,ěM
   EN    > -EN,ěMI
   EN    > -EN,ěMA
   DO    > -DO,OHO
   DO    > -DO,OMU
   DO    > -DO,OM
   DO    > -DO,ýM
   CO    > -CO,čEHO
   CO    > -CO,čEMU
   CO    > -CO,čEM
   CO    > -CO,číM
   áš    > -áš,AšEHO
   áš    > -áš,AšEMU
   áš    > -áš,AšEM
   áš    > -áš,AšíM
   áš    > -áš,AšE
   áš    > -áš,Aší
   áš    > -áš,AšI
   áš    > -áš,AšICH
   áš    > -áš,AšIM
   áš    > -áš,AšIMI
   áš    > -áš,AšIMA
   ůJ    > -ůJ,éHO
   ůJ    > -ůJ,éMU
   ůJ    > -ůJ,éM
   ůJ    > -ůJ,ýM
   ůJ    > -ůJ,á
   ůJ    > -ůJ,OJE
   ůJ    > -ůJ,é
   ůJ    > -ůJ,OJí
   ůJ    > -ůJ,OU
   ůJ    > -ůJ,OJI
   ůJ    > -ůJ,í
   ůJ    > -ůJ,ýCH
   ůJ    > -ůJ,ýMI
   ůJ    > -ůJ,ýMA

flag *R:
   [BPVMFDNT]ý    > -ý,ě
   [LSZ]ý    > -ý,E
   [^C]Hý    > -Hý,ZE
   CHý    > -CHý,šE
   Rý    > -Rý,řE
   [SC]Ký    > -ý,Y
   [^SC]Ký    > -Ký,CE
   [DNT]í    > -í,ě
   [Zž]í    > -í,E
   čí    > -í,EJI
   [Eě]Jší    > -ší,I
   [BDFMNPTVW]    > ě
   G    > -G,ZE
   CH    > -CH,šE
   [^C]H    > -H,ZE
   K    > -K,CE
   [CčJLřSšZž]    > E
   R    > -R,řE
   [BDFMNPTVW]O    > -O,ě
   GO    > -GO,ZE
   CHO    > -CHO,šE
   [^C]HO    > -HO,ZE
   KO    > -KO,CE
   [CčJLřSšZž]O    > -O,E
   RO    > -RO,řE
