root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
afentivnější/YRW
aksamitový/YR
albínův/Y
ambiciózní/YKRN
anafylaktický/YCR
anglofonní/YRN
antidogmatistický/YCR
apretovací/Y
arabskosvahilský/YKRN
asertivní/YKRN
aspirační/YRN
autoerotický/YCR
autoritativnější/YRW
balamutící/Y
baroknější/YRW
Bartoňová/Y
baryonový/YKRN
Bédův/Y
bernský/YR
bezectný/YKRN
bezchybný/YKR
bezobsažnější/YRE
beztvarý/YKR
bezúrodný/YKR
bibliotékářčin/Y
bizonův/Y
bláznivější/YRE
bloudivý/YKR
boční/YRN
borovnický/Y
bratrovražednější/YRE
bratrštější/YRW
brusivý/YKRN
Brynychův/Y
buližníkový/YR
bytněný/YKRN
Cauchy/Y
ceněný/YKRN
citovávaný/YKRN
ctětínský/Y
časný/YKRN
černozelený/YR
čertvíkterý/Y
čtyrnásobný/YKR
čtyřhodinový/YR
čtyřkřídlý/YKR
dedukovávaný/YKRN
degustační/YKRN
dechový/YR
derivovaný/YKRN
detailní/YKRN
detoxikační/YR
dezorganizovaný/YKR
divnější/YRE
divný/YKR
doatakovaný/YKRN
dočepovaný/YKRN
dohasínaný/YKRN
dohozenější/YRW
dohýřený/YKRN
dokuchávaný/YKRN
dokumetovávaný/YKRN
domučený/YKRN
domytý/YRN
dopištěný/YKRN
doprogramovaný/YKRN
dosouzený/YKRN
dospalý/YKRN
dostředivější/YRE
dotíravý/YKRN
doutnavý/YR
dozobávaný/YKRN
Drahý/Y
druidský/YR
dusanější/YRW
dusaný/YKRN
dvacetizlatkový/YKRN
dvouapůlmetrový/YKR
dvoumiliardový/YR
dvoupruhý/YKRN
ekvatoreální/YKRN
elektromechanický/YRN
empírovější/YRW
eugeničtější/YRW
expresívní/YKRN
extendovaný/YKRN
farářský/YR
Filipíncův/Y
formálnější/YRW
formanský/YKR
freewarový/YR
gaullistický/YCR
gilošovaný/YKRN
glutamový/YKRN
hádanější/YRW
Hájkův/Y
hejtmančin/Y
heterotrofní/YKR
hitlerový/YRN
hluchovský/Y
homozygotní/YKR
horákovský/YKRN
Hornychův/Y
Hrůzův/Y
hryzavější/YRW
hubovaný/YKRN
chaloupkářčin/Y
charakterističtější/YRW
chovatelný/YKRN
chudeřický/Y
Chvalkovský/YKRN
indikovaný/YKRN
infinitivní/YRN
inkvizitorský/YRN
ionizovaný/YKRN
iracionální/YKRN
Jakubův/Y
jednodomý/YKR
jednomístný/YKR
jednosytný/YKR
jílový/YRN
jitrnicový/YKRN
Johanisův/Y
kampaňový/YR
kantovský/YRN
kasační/YKRN
katolický/YRN
kdovíjaký/YRN
klímající/YN
klouzkovaný/YKRN
kničivý/YKRN
Koláčková/Y
kompatibilní/YKRN
kompilovaný/YKRN
konfigurovaný/YKRN
kontemplativní/YRN
kontroversní/YKRN
korozivzdorný/YKR
kostivalový/YR
kovodělný/YKRN
krahujcův/Y
kritizovanější/YRW
krušnější/YRW
křemenný/YKRN
kulturistický/YR
kulturněhistorický/YCRN
kvazivědecký/YKR
labouristický/YRN
lahvový/YR
legitimizovaný/YKRN
Lejdarův/Y
lesnický/YRN
lilkovitý/YKRN
linoleový/YKR
lítostnější/YRW
Lubinová/Y
mačkaný/YKRN
magnetooptický/YRN
malawský/YRN
maskovaný/YKRN
Masnicův/Y
mazaný/YKRN
meristémový/YKRN
metaboličtější/YRW
mikrolegovaný/YKRN
militaristčin/Y
mimoprodukční/YKR
mnohonásobný/YKR
mnohotisícový/YKR
mnohý/YK
motelový/YRN
Mouralová/Y
mrazený/YKRN
myotonický/YRN
nabarvenější/YRN
nabarvený/YKRN
nadělovatelnější/YRN
nadělovávaný/YKRN
nafrkaný/YKRN
nafukovávaný/YKRN
nahněvanější/YRW
nakouřený/YKRN
naleštěný/YKRN
nametávaný/YKRN
namokající/YN
napodobitelnější/YRW
naporcovávaný/YKRN
nasliněný/YKRN
nasolený/YKRN
nasolovaný/YKRN
naštípnutý/YKRN
naváděnější/YRW
navyklý/YKRN
neandertálský/YKRN
několikaminutový/YR
nepozorovaný/YKR
neurologičtější/YRE
nitrožilní/YR
nožířský/YKRN
nuerský/YR
obdivný/YKRN
objízdný/YKRN
oblouděný/YKRN
obmezenější/YRW
obrňovaný/YKRN
obtloukávanější/YRW
ocejchovaný/YKRN
odbarvovací/Y
oddechový/YR
oddestilovávaný/YKRN
odjídaný/YKRN
odklínovaný/YKRN
odkrájený/YKRN
odloupnutý/YKRN
odpařený/YKRN
odplsťovaný/YKRN
odřený/YKRN
odskákaný/YKRN
odstartovaný/YKRN
odtlačovaný/YKRN
odvod/HR
ofocený/YKRN
ohařický/Y
okénkový/YKRN
okótovaný/YKRN
omeletový/YKRN
onanovaný/YRN
oněměný/YKRN
opravňovaný/YKRN
optičtější/YRW
optoelektronický/YRN
osmeronásobný/YKR
osmibitový/YKR
ospravedlnitelný/YKRN
oštěpařský/YKRN
oštipovaný/YKRN
ovlivněnější/YRW
ozbrojený/YKRN
ozubnicový/YR
pánský/YR
papundeklový/YR
paráděný/YKRN
pátraný/YKRN
Patriciový/YKRN
peprný/YKR
Pešíkův/Y
pětasedmdesátiminutový/YR
písničkářčin/Y
pištěný/YKRN
pívaný/YKRN
plsťový/YKRN
plukovnický/YRN
poangličťovaný/YKRN
podestýlaný/YKRN
podeutektičtější/YRW
podlejší/YRW
podpovrchový/YKR
podrytý/YKRN
pohlcovaný/YKRN
pohostinský/YRN
pohryzanější/YRW
pokořitelný/YKRN
polemický/YCRN
polodivočejší/YRW
polotěžký/YKRO
pomaďarštěný/YKRN
poodstoupený/YKRN
poplašenější/YRW
popřenější/YRN
porušovaný/YKRN
postdoktorandský/YR
postrádající/YN
posukovaný/YKRN
potřebný/YKRN
poutavý/YKRN
povívaný/YKRN
pozlobený/YKRN
pozoruhodný/YKRN
pravotočivý/YRN
predikovanější/YRW
preparativní/YKRN
prodřený/YKRN
produkovávaný/YKRN
progresívnější/YRW
projódlovaný/YKRN
prokopírovaný/YKRN
promazávaný/YKRN
proniklý/YN
propašovaný/YKRN
proponovaný/YKRN
prostřelený/YKRN
prostřídaný/YKRN
protaženější/YRW
protipancéřový/YKR
protipěchotní/YR
provožený/YKRN
prozápadní/YRN
prozářený/YKRN
přebroušený/YKRN
přecvičovaný/YKRN
předestíranější/YRN
předjížděný/YKRN
předoperační/YR
předšívaný/YKRN
přeháňkový/YKRN
přehlášený/YKRN
přechovaný/YKRN
překuckaný/YKRN
překvašovaný/YKRN
přeorávaný/YKRN
přepažovaný/YKRN
přepočtený/YKRN
přesedlý/YKRN
přesuvnější/YRW
přetápěný/YKRN
přetkaný/YKRN
přezbrojovávaný/YKRN
přezkoumatelnější/YRW
příchuť/K
přijíždějící/YN
přikloněný/YKRN
přimontovávaný/YKRN
přípovrchový/YKR
přisekaný/YKRN
přistoupený/YKRN
přiučovaný/YKRN
přiválený/YKRN
půjčovaný/YKRN
půlminutový/YR
puštěný/YKRN
rakvický/Y
rašelinový/YRN
refundovaný/YKRN
rekvalifikační/YR
renomovanější/YRW
revolucionářský/YKRN
Roithův/Y
romanizační/YR
rozbřeskovaný/YKRN
rozdrobený/YKRN
rozený/YKRN
rozestavěný/YKRN
rozježenější/YRW
rozklíčovaný/YKRN
rozmařilejší/YRW
rozmasírovaný/YKRN
rozmáznutý/YKRN
rozplozený/YKRN
rozprýskanější/YRW
rozstřelovaný/YKRN
rozšifrovanější/YRW
roztínaný/YKRN
rozuzlený/YKRN
ruinovávaný/YKRN
Rusinčin/Y
různobarevný/YKR
Římalův/Y
řinčený/YKRN
samoduální/YKR
scelovací/Y
sčetlý/YKRN
sebevražedný/YKR
sedmiznakový/YKR
Sekerkův/Y
serializovatelný/YKRN
seskládávaný/YKRN
severoitalský/YKRN
sextánův/Y
schematizovaný/YKRN
sítový/YKR
Skalníková/Y
skleslejší/YRW
skvělý/YKRN
sledovnaný/YKRN
slezský/YR
slýchaný/YKRN
smrkovější/YRE
smyslný/YKRN
snižovaný/YKRN
souhrnnější/YRE
souvěrcův/Y
spařený/YKRN
splynutý/YKRN
spoluvlast/K
spořádávající/Y
stádový/YKRN
Stehlíkův/Y
stiženější/YRW
stotisícový/YKR
strhací/Y
stromovitý/YRN
sufixový/YRN
suchdolský/Y
svěcený/YKRN
svídový/YR
svorkovaný/YKRN
šedesátikorunový/YR
Šenfeldův/Y
škarohlídský/YKRN
škrobnatý/YKRN
škrobovější/YRW
šterlinkový/YKRN
tarifikační/YR
telematičtější/YRW
tenzorový/YKRN
Texlová/Y
touškovský/Y
transsexuální/YR
trojštítový/YKR
trudomyslný/YKR
třítunový/YR
turmalínový/YR
učinkovaný/YKRN
uherskobrodský/Y
uchystaný/YKRN
ulomený/YKRN
umírňující/YN
upovídanější/YRW
úředníčkův/Y
uřvaný/YKRN
útržkový/YR
utříbený/YKRN
uvážlivý/YKRN
Vandin/Y
velehorský/YKR
velkoplodý/YKR
velkoplošný/YKR
vidlicovitý/YKR
vkročený/YKRN
vkusový/YR
vlnivý/YKRN
vpálenější/YRW
vsazený/YKRN
všeodborový/YKR
vtloukávanější/YRW
vyčtený/YKRN
Vyhlasův/Y
vyhledatelný/YKRN
vyjezděný/YKRN
výkrmný/YKRN
vylouhovaný/YKRN
vymezovaný/YKRN
vyplakávaný/YKRN
výražkový/YKR
vyříznutější/YRW
vysokovýkonný/YRN
vyšisovaný/YKRN
vytrysknutý/YKRN
vytýkanější/YW
vyvztekaný/YKRN
vzpěračův/Y
zabahněný/YKRN
zabroušený/YKRN
zadržující/YN
zajizvený/YKRN
zákeřnější/YRW
zakouřenější/YRW
zamixovaný/YKRN
zapalovanější/YRW
zápasnický/YRN
zarušitelný/YKRN
zastaralý/YKRN
zaškrcovaný/YKRN
zatloukaný/YKRN
zavinutý/YRN
zbytnělejší/YRW
zcepenělý/YKRN
zdrhnutý/YKRN
zhnědnutý/YKRN
Zimův/Y
zjasňovaný/YKRN
zlatokorunský/YKRN
zmařený/YKRN
známý/YKRN
znormovaný/YKRN
zpátečničtější/YRW
zrezatělý/YKRN
zrůdnější/YRE
ztuchlejší/YRW
zvyklý/YKRN
žebříčkovitý/YKR
žirový/YR
